Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4025.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Gas and petroleum refinery study committee; membership; duties; report; delayed repeal A. The gas and petroleum refinery study committee is established consisting of members who have knowledge of gasoline or petroleum refinery supply and operations. Members of the committee are appointed by the following: 1. The president of the senate. 2. The speaker of the house of representatives. B. The committee shall meet at least two times per year at dates and times to be decided by the committee. C. Committee members are not eligible to receive compensation but are eligible for reimbursement of expenses under title 38, chapter 4, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes. D. The study committee shall: 1. Study and address specific issues related to the availability of gasoline and petroleum in this state. 2. Study the feasibility of constructing gas and petroleum refineries in this state. 3. On or before October 1, 2027, submit a report regarding the committee's activities and recommendations to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state. E. This section is repealed from and after December 31, 2027. Sec. 2. Legislative findings The legislature finds that: 1. This state imports a significant portion of its gasoline from California, with estimates indicating that California refineries supply roughly fifty percent or more of the state's total fuel supply. This is particularly true for Phoenix, Maricopa county and northern areas of this state. 2. Because this state has no major oil refineries, it relies on California imports via the West Line pipeline and supplies from Texas. 3. The overreliance on other states for gasoline and petroleum resources is a threat to the consumers of this state.